Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4 SEWER AND WATER SYSTEMS
31-35-415. Continuing rights of bondholders.

The failure of any holder of any bond or coupon issued under this part 4 to proceed as provided in section 31-35-409 or in any proceedings appertaining to the issuance of such bond or coupon shall not relieve the municipality, its governing body, or any of its officers, agents, and employees of any liability for failure to perform or carry out any duty, obligation, or other commitment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1260, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-415 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-416. Validation.

All revenue bonds and any coupons appertaining thereto relating to a water system, sewer system, or joint water and sewer system issued or purportedly issued prior to March 13, 1962, and all acts and proceedings had or taken or purportedly had or taken prior to said date by or on behalf of municipalities, under law or under color of law, preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, and issuance of all water revenue bonds, sewer revenue bonds, and joint water and sewer revenue bonds, including any coupons appertaining thereto, the authorization and execution of all other contracts, and the exercise of other powers in this part 4 are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed by this section except as provided in section 31-35-417, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, other than constitutional, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities, other than constitutional, in such securities, acts, and proceedings, in such authorization, execution, sale, and issuance, and in such exercise of powers; and such securities and other contracts are and shall be binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of such municipality to which they appertain in accordance with their terms and their authorization proceedings.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1260, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-416 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-417. Effect of and limitations upon validation.

This part 4 shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to validate any such securities issued and other contracts executed prior to March 13, 1962, of such municipalities and any acts and proceedings taken appertaining to the issuance of such securities or execution of other contracts by such municipalities or otherwise prior to said date which the general assembly could have supplied or provided for in the law under which such securities were issued or such other contracts were executed and such acts or proceedings were taken; but this part 4 shall be limited to the validation of such securities, other contracts, acts, and proceedings to the extent to which the same can be effectuated under the state and federal constitutions. This part 4 shall not operate to validate, ratify, approve, confirm, or legalize any bond or coupon, other contract, act, proceeding, or other matter, the legality of which is being contested, or inquired into in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined and shall not operate to confirm, validate, or legalize any bond or coupon, other contract, act, proceeding, or other matter which, prior to March 13, 1962, has been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void, or ineffective.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1260, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-417 as it existed prior to 1975.